Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Article 5. Disability and Relief Fund for Firemen and Policemen Under Laws 1930, Chapter 55.

§ 21-29-201.
Creation of disability and relief fund and system for firemen and policemen.

In each city in the State of Mississippi having a population of not less than three thousand (3,000) according to the last federal census or according to any subsequent federal census, and having a regularly organized, paid fire department with equipment of the value of not less than Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00) and/or regularly organized paid police department, and having not less than two (2) paid firemen and/or not less than two (2) paid policemen, whose sole employment is by such city in its fire department and for police department, there may be provided in connection with the regularly organized and maintained paid fire department and/or police department of such city a special fund known as the “disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen,” hereinafter called “said fund,” which shall exist and be maintained for the benefit of the persons hereinafter named and shall be derived, raised and administered in the manner hereinafter provided.

Said fund and system of relief, when inaugurated, shall and does create a disability and relief system to apply to the members of the regularly organized, maintained and paid fire department and/or police department of such municipality. Notwithstanding any other section of this article no such fund known as the “disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen” shall be created by any city after March 1, 1976, unless by an amendment to this article by the legislature of the State of Mississippi.

Any reference in other sections of this article to members of the fire and police department shall be defined to include only the members of the disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen of the city.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3494-01, 3494-04; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, §§ 1, 3; Laws, 1976, ch. 463, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1976).

§ 21-29-203.
Election as to inauguration of disability and relief fund and system.

Said fund and system of relief to the fire department and/or police department shall be inaugurated in each municipality only in the following manner: each municipality desiring to create said fund and inaugurate this system of disability and relief for its firemen and/or policemen, shall call an election after giving three weeks consecutive notice in a newspaper published in said city, stating the date, purpose and time of holding said election for the electors to determine whether or not said municipality shall adopt the “disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen.” At said election the ballots used by the qualified electors shall read: “For the Disability and Relief Fund for Firemen and Policemen,” “Against the Disability and Relief Fund for Firemen and Policemen.” Said election shall be held as such other elections of like nature, and if at said election the majority of qualified electors voting thereat, shall vote against the creation of said fund and system, then the said fund and system shall not be created and said fund and system shall not be inaugurated in said municipality. Should a majority of said qualified electors voting at said election vote in favor of the creation of said fund and the operation of said system, the said fund and system shall be inaugurated by said municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494-02; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, § 1(a).

§ 21-29-205.
Election as to continuation of disability and relief system and fund; effect thereof; discontinuance of new memberships.

Whenever the said fund shall be created, and a system of disability and relief for firemen and/or policemen inaugurated in any municipality, at any time upon the petition of not less than twenty percent (20%) of the qualified electors of said municipality addressed to the said officers composing the governing board of said municipality, requesting an election to determine whether said municipality shall continue to operate under the provisions of this article, the said governing board of said municipality shall order an election to determine said question. Notice of the election shall be given and conduct of the election shall be had as is provided in Section 21-29-203. If at said election a majority of the qualified electors of said municipality shall vote against the continuance of operation of said municipality under the provisions of this article, the said governing board of said municipality shall at the next regular meeting thereof held after said election order the abolition and discontinuance of said system. The said fund and the said system, however, shall continue as to members of the paid fire department and/or police department of said municipality already in service and entitled to participation in said fund. The said system shall be worked out in said municipality to its end as to said members of the paid fire department and/or police department, but no new members entering the service of the fire and/or police department of said municipality shall be taken into or embraced within said system. If at said election a majority of the qualified electors of said municipality shall not vote for a discontinuance of said system in said municipality, no other election in said regard shall be held therein within a period of one (1) year thereafter. No new members may be joined by the fund after July 1, 1987, and all new employees of the police department and/or fire department of any municipality having such funds shall become members of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi after July 1, 1987.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494-26; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, § 24; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 19, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-207.
Organization of board of disability and relief; advisory board; compensation.

The Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi shall organize itself into a body to be known as the “Board of Disability and Relief of the City of_______________ .”

In each municipality there shall be a board to serve in an advisory capacity to the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System with respect to matters concerning the disability and relief fund. Such board shall consist of five (5) members as follows: two (2) shall be elected by the membership of the police department, two (2) shall be elected by the membership of the fire department and the mayor or his designee shall be an ex officio member. Retired members of the police department and fire department may participate in elections to choose members of the board, and such retired members are also eligible to serve on the board. The term of elected members shall be for four (4) years, and any vacancy in the elected membership shall be filled in the same manner as the original membership was selected.

The members of the board shall receive no compensation or pay from the disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen for the discharge of their duties, except as otherwise provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3494-10, 3494-25; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, §§ 8, 23; Laws, 1966, ch. 594, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 356, § 2; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 20; Laws, 1994, ch. 404 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1994).

§ 21-29-209.
Powers and duties of the board of disability and relief.

The board shall fix a time for regular meetings in its minutes and it shall keep minutes of its meetings, which shall be public records. Special meetings may be held upon the call of the chairman of the board or any two (2) members thereof, upon twenty-four (24) hours’ written notice, stating the purpose of the meeting, or at any time when all members are present.

The board shall have the duty and power to promptly hear and pass upon all applications of firemen and/or policemen or of beneficiaries of deceased firemen and of deceased policemen for participation in the benefits of said fund. Said board may hear witnesses, administer oaths, find facts, and make decisions in all matters properly before said board, which decisions shall be final except upon appeals in the way hereafter set forth. Said board shall order payments made according to the facts found and the provisions of this article, which payments shall be made as far as funds may be available. The board may invest the funds as provided in Section 25-11-121, and such funds may be commingled with other system funds for the most advantageous investments; however, each fund shall have separate accounting status.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494-10; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, § 8; Laws, 1966, ch. 594, § 2; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 21, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§§ 21-29-211 through 21-29-213.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 35, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

21-29-211. [Codes, 1942, § 3494-20; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; 1930, ch. 55, § 18.]

21-29-213. [Codes, 1942, § 3494-14; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; 1930, ch. 55, § 12.]

§ 21-29-215.
Creation of board of disability and relief appeals.

The commissioner of insurance, the attorney general, and the secretary of state of the State of Mississippi, shall be and are constituted a body to be known as the “board of disability and relief appeals,” with full duty and power to hear, consider and determine all matters brought before it on appeal from decisions of the boards of disability and relief. Determinations by said appeal board shall be final.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494-11; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, § 9.

§ 21-29-217.
Appeals.

Any applicant for benefits of the disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen, or any two (2) active members of said fire department, or any two (2) active members of said police department, being aggrieved at the decision or order of the board of trustees, may file with the board of trustees and with said board of disability and relief appeals duplicate copies of a petition for a rehearing of the matter in which such decision or order was made. Within thirty (30) days thereafter the board of trustees shall file with said appeal board, true copies of all papers and documents which were before it, all evidence of record before it and a statement of all evidence heard by it and not of record, all certified to be true and correct, whereupon said appeal board shall fix a time for hearing and shall give the board of trustees and the petitioner or petitioners for appeal notice of said such time for hearing. When the matter shall come on for hearing said appeal board shall have before it all papers, statements, matters and things certified to it by the board of trustees, as well as such additional evidence and documents as it may hear and receive and upon all of the same shall hear, consider and decide said matter fully and finally according to this article and the facts. Said appeal board may cause witnesses to be sworn by any one (1) of its members, or by any other authority competent to administer oaths. Said appeal board may meet for all purposes at any time in the State of Mississippi when all are present, or upon the call of two (2) members thereof. Said appeal board shall certify its decision to the board of trustees, and such decision or order shall be final and binding and said fund shall be disbursed according thereto. Any suit or other action affecting said fund shall be by or against the board of trustees as custodian of said fund and shall be filed in the Chancery Court of Hinds County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494-11; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, § 9; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 22, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-219.
Funding; ad valorem tax, or use of other funds, contributions, and salary deductions.

The Disability and Relief Fund for Firemen and Policemen shall be created and, except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, maintained by an ad valorem tax levied annually on all property in the municipality, provided the election called for in Section 21-29-203 has authorized the creation of the fund. The levy made, and the deductions from the salaries of members, shall be in an amount sufficient, but not more than the amount necessary, to make the system actuarially sound by July 1, 2000, as certified to the municipality by the board. Such tax shall not be included in the ten percent (10%) limitation on increases under Section 27-39-321, nor shall any tax increase exceed one-half (1/2) mill per year; however, if any levy to pay debt service on bonds issued under Section 31-25-20 as described in subsection (2) of this section is reduced for any year as a result of payment of the bonds or otherwise, the levy under this subsection (1) for such year may be increased by an amount, in addition to the one-half (1/2) mill otherwise authorized, not to exceed the reduction for such year in the millage levied to pay debt service on the bonds.

In addition to, or in lieu of, the method of funding provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the municipality may fund or assist in funding the retirement system through the use of revenue bonds issued pursuant to Section 31-25-20. Any tax levied to service the debt on such bonds shall not be included in the ten percent (10%) limitation on increases under Section 27-39-321.

The fund may be created and maintained by such gifts, donations and bequests as may be made to the fund by any person or corporation, by any appropriation or tax levy, or both, of the municipality, by such sum or sums as the municipality may receive from insurance companies for the benefit of the fund, and by the deduction by the municipality from the salary of each member of the Disability and Relief Fund for Firemen and Policemen of not less than seven percent (7%) nor more than ten percent (10%) of the amount thereof. Any increase to an amount in excess of seven percent (7%) shall be in increments of not more than one percent (1%) per annum. No increase from the deduction of seven percent (7%) shall be made unless the board determines that the avails of the tax levy of three (3) mills, when combined with the avails of the deduction of seven percent (7%), is insufficient to keep the system actuarially sound.

The municipality and the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System may enter into such contracts and agreements as are deemed necessary to implement the provisions of this section, including, but not limited to, contracts and agreements addressing the use, application and investment of proceeds of bonds issued under Section 31-25-20 and earnings thereon and the relative rights and obligations of the municipality and the Public Employees’ Retirement System during the period that the bonds are outstanding and thereafter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3494-02, 3494-05, 3494-06; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, §§ 1(a), 4, 5; Laws, 1960, ch. 429; Laws, 1966, ch. 594, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 363, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 444, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 408; Laws, 1976, ch. 463, § 9; Laws, 1985, ch. 536, § 8; Laws, 1986, ch. 509, § 3; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 23; Laws, 1994, ch. 548, § 4; Laws, 1997, ch. 506, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1997).

§ 21-29-220.
Tax proceeds transferred to Public Employees’ Retirement System.

The Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi is hereby authorized to deduct two percent (2%) of all tax levied hereunder and paid into the “disability and relief fund” for firemen and policemen to be transferred to the expense fund of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi to defray the cost of administering this fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 24, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-221.
Discontinuance and reinstatement of ad valorem tax; actuarial study.

The ad valorem tax provided for in Section 21-29-219 shall be stopped by the municipality whenever the interest from the relief fund shall be sufficient to pay all disabilities and relief which are a charge against said fund and future requirements as determined by the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi. However, when the board of trustees determines that interest from said fund is insufficient to meet the charges of disability or relief, then said municipality shall reinstate said tax for the purpose of building up the relief fund until such time as the fund is actuarially sound, as determined by the Board of Trustees.

The board of trustees, for each municipality with a disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen, shall have prepared an actuarial study of the fund at least every four (4) years and report the findings to the Legislature of the State of Mississippi. The first study shall be filed with the Legislature in January 1980.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494-02; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, § 1(a); Laws, 1976, ch. 463, § 10; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 25, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-223.
Disability and relief fund constitutes special fund; transfer of moneys to Public Employees’ Retirement System.

The disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen shall be set aside as a special trust fund and shall only be disbursed in the manner hereafter provided. Such fund shall be a part of the public funds of the Public Employees’ Retirement System and shall be kept by the board as it is required to keep its other funds. Interest earned on said fund shall be credited to and become a part of said fund. All moneys on deposit in such funds on July 1, 1987, shall be paid over to the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi on or before July 1, 1987.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3494-03, 3494-12; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch 55, §§ 2, 10; Laws, 1966, ch. 594, § 3; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 26, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-225.
Allowances upon disability and relief fund.

All allowances made upon the disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen shall be drawn against the fund by the board of trustees, and shall be issued only upon compliance with the rules and regulations of the board of trustees, or the board of disability and relief appeals.

Said fund or its increase, or the interest or dividends therefrom, shall be paid out by the Public Employees’ Retirement System herein authorized.

Necessary and proper payments may be made from said fund if it be deemed necessary by the board of trustees to make expenditures for the preservation of the fund or its proper administration. Such expenditures shall be limited to what may be necessary to safeguard and administer the fund by means of court proceedings, and to stenographic and clerical assistance.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3494-03, 3494-12, 3494-25; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, §§ 2, 10, 23; Laws, 1966, ch. 594, § 3; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 27, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-227.
Investment of part of disability and relief fund.

The authority is vested in the board of trustees to invest such part of said fund as may not be immediately required, in investments authorized under Section 25-11-121 with the right to change said investment from time to time, and with the right and duty to convert invested funds into current funds as the same may be needed for the purposes of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494-12; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, § 10; Laws, 1966, ch. 594, § 3; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 28, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-229.
Tax on premiums of fire and lightning insurers.

The Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, as soon as it is decided that such city shall come within the terms of this article, shall notify the Insurance Commissioner of the State of Mississippi that such city is operating within such terms. The commissioner shall notify all insurance companies, which shall include mutual, interinsurer, and reciprocal associations or companies, transacting the business of fire and lightning insurance in the State of Mississippi, of the fact that such city is operating within such terms. In the event that any such insurance company writes or has written any insurance in said municipality, the rates of said insurance company being based in any way upon the efficiency and equipment of the fire department of said municipality, such company shall be notified that at the time that foreign insurance companies are required to report to the State Tax Commission the premiums charged or received in Mississippi, then such company, whether foreign or domestic, shall truly report to the State Tax Commission at the same time as reports on the general tax on premiums are made as provided in Section 27-15-107, sending a duplicate of such report to such board of trustees, the amount of premiums charged by said company for fire and lightning insurance on property situated in such city within the period covered by the report made to the State Tax Commission for purposes of taxation of such state, less premiums returned to policyholder and cancellations on account of policies not taken. It is the legislative intent that said report of premiums shall include and cover all premiums charged or received within said period, less returned premiums and cancellations as aforesaid in connection with the insurance of property situated in such city, which are reported for the purposes of taxation by said state. Such report for the purposes of this section shall not include premiums contracted for prior to such time as the commissioner shall have notified the company that such city is within the terms and purposes of this article. Said premiums so required to be reported shall be and they are hereby taxed to the extent of one-half of one percent (1/2 of 1%) of said premiums, after deducting said returned premiums and cancellations, which tax shall be paid to the State Tax Commission by the insurance company at the same time that the general tax on premiums is paid to the State Tax Commission as provided in Section 27-15-107. The insurance company paying the same shall notify the State Tax Commission of the name of the city responsible for the maintenance of such fire department and system, and, at the same time, shall give such city duplicate notice of the amount paid to the State Tax Commission. The State Tax Commission is hereby authorized and empowered to collect such taxes in the same manner and by the same means that he is required and empowered to collect other taxes imposed upon insurance premiums.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494-07; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, § 6 ¶ 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 462, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 29; Laws, 1994, ch. 502, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1994).

§ 21-29-231.
On what premiums tax may be imposed; tax not to be used as an element of premium.

Said tax on insurance premiums shall not be imposed or collected upon any premiums except upon those under insurance policies upon property situated in the municipality coming under the provisions of this article. The tax paid hereunder for the maintenance of such fire department system in any municipality coming under the provisions of this article, shall not be used as an element of any premium or be considered in the making of rates except in proper causes under the provisions of the rating bureau law in connection with property situated in the municipality to which said tax is paid.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494-08; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, § 6 ¶ 2.

§ 21-29-233.
Duty of state tax commission.

It shall be the duty of the State Tax Commission to collect and to enforce the collection of said tax of one-half of one percent (1/2 of 1%) upon all premiums paid to insurance companies doing business in said municipality, which said insurance companies have written insurance on rates, said rates having been compiled by taking into consideration the fire department and equipment of said municipality. Upon the State Tax Commission having collected said tax, it shall promptly pay the same to the board of trustees for the benefit of said fund for disability and relief of firemen and policemen.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494-09; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, § 7; Laws, 1984, ch. 462, § 2; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 30, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-235.
Failure of insurance company to report.

Any fire insurance company, subject to the tax mentioned in Section 21-29-229, which shall fail to make a report or statement required therein after thirty days demand therefor by the commissioner of insurance, shall forfeit to said fund the sum of five hundred dollars, to be recovered by the commissioner for the use of such municipality, and the commissioner shall have the right to revoke the license of such company.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494-22; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, § 20.

§ 21-29-237.
Persons entitled to benefits.

Every member of said fire department and police department including its officers, but not including the governing authorities of said city on account of their relation as such to said fire department and/or police department, who are members of the disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen shall come under the provisions and benefits of this article, and shall receive all benefits provided for in this article. All firemen and policemen who are employed in the said fire department or police department after adoption of a resolution by the municipality in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of Section 21-29-17 shall not become members of the disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494-15; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch 55, § 13; Laws, 1976, ch. 463, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1976).

§ 21-29-239.
Service records to be kept.

The Public Employees’ Retirement System shall keep a record of service of the members of the fire department and police department, which record shall show the history of employment of each member of said fire department and police department. Said record shall be written up fully at the time such city comes within the terms of this article, and it shall thereafter be kept entered up fully and correctly. All records currently maintained by the municipality’s affected membership shall be forwarded to the Public Employees’ Retirement System not later than July 1, 1987. Any additional changes shall be forwarded to the Public Employees’ Retirement System as made.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494-13; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, § 11; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 31, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-241.
Disability relief.

If any member of the fire department and/or police department shall become or be found to be totally disabled for the discharge of his duties as a member of said fire department and/or police department, mentally or physically, by reason of sickness or injury caused or sustained by reason of service or discharge of his duty in said department, after such city shall have come within the terms of this article, said board of disability and relief shall order the payment and there shall be paid from said fund to said fireman and/or policeman each month thereafter an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of said fireman’s and/or policeman’s monthly salary. Such amount shall be paid throughout such total disability for service.

If any member of the fire department and/or police department shall become or be found to be permanently and totally disabled for the discharge of his duties as a member of said fire department and/or police department, mentally or physically, by reason of sickness or injury, and said member shall have had not less than five (5) years’ service with such department, there shall be paid to said fireman and/or policeman from said fund, for each year’s active service, not to exceed a period of twenty (20) years, one-fortieth (1/40) of the monthly salary of such fireman and/or policeman at the time such disability is incurred. Such amount shall be paid throughout such permanent and total disability.

In passing upon the question of disability, said board shall refer the matter to its medical board, or such other physician or physicians as it may deem proper, and said board may require like examinations from time to time throughout the period of disability claimed by said fireman and/or policeman.

If said city pays a salary to its fireman and/or policeman while disabled in an amount equal to the disability relief allowed hereunder, said fireman and/or policeman shall not be entitled to any disability relief hereunder.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3485.5, 3494-17; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch 55, § 15; Laws, 1964, chs. 504, 505, § 2; Laws, 1974, ch. 395, § 2; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 32, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-243.
Physical and mental examination.

In all matters involving the disability or sickness of a member of such fire and/or police department, such member shall submit himself to physical and mental examination when and as required by said disability and relief board of said governing authorities. A failure or refusal so to do shall suspend the benefits of this article until such time as he shall submit himself to such examination.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494-21; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, § 21.

§ 21-29-245.
Retirement benefits.

If any member of said fire and/or police department who has been in paid fire and/or police department service for as long as twenty (20) years before making application hereinafter mentioned, the last ten (10) years of which shall have been continuous in the city in which the application is made, shall make written application for retirement and relief, the board of disability and relief shall without medical examinations of disability, retire him from active service in said fire and/or police department. Upon such retirement from active service said disability and relief board shall order the payment to such retired member monthly from said fund a sum equal to fifty percent (50%) of the average monthly base salary and longevity pay received as salary by such member in the six-month period next before the filing of such application in said fire and/or police department. Such payments shall thereafter be made to said retired member for life, such payments to be known as “retired relief.”

Any member of the fire and/or police department who has been in paid fire and/or police department service for longer than twenty (20) years shall be entitled to and shall receive additional retired relief payment for life in a sum equal to one and seven-tenths percent (1.7%) of the same monthly base salary and longevity pay received by such member in the six-month period next preceding the filing of said application for each full year of service in excess of twenty (20) years’ service. However, such additional retired relief payment shall be paid only for each year served after July 1, 1966. No retired relief payment to any member shall exceed sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of the average monthly base salary and longevity pay received by a member for the six-month period next preceding the filing of said application, except such other additional benefits as may be hereinafter provided.

The board of disability and relief shall, when a member of the fire and/or police department completes thirty-five (35) years of paid employment, or attains the age of sixty (60), whichever occurs first, retire him from active service in said fire and/or police department and order the payment of such funds as the member is entitled to under this article.

Periods of time in which a member may have been inactive on account of physical or mental disability shall not be excluded in computing the twenty-year period and the ten-year period hereinabove mentioned. Neither shall there be excluded therefrom periods of time within which a member may have been absent from his employment while serving in the Armed Forces of the United States, or any civil employee engaged by the Armed Forces of the United States while serving outside the continental United States, in time of war during World War I, World War II, the Korean Conflict, Cuban Crisis, Berlin Crisis, Vietnam Conflict, or when involuntarily called on active duty, provided that the maximum period for such creditable service shall be four (4) years unless positive proof can be furnished by such person that he was retained in the Armed Forces by cause beyond his control, and without opportunity of discharge, and provided that the discharge or release of such member from the Armed Forces was under conditions other than dishonorable. Any member who has been retired or is voluntarily retired hereunder, or who has received relief or disability benefits hereunder, shall be required to report such duties as then may be required of them.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494-18; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55 § 16; Laws, 1948, ch. 421; Laws, 1966, ch. 596, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 575, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 513, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 404, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 33, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-247.
Cost-of-living increases.

From and after January 1, 1971, all persons receiving retirement benefits under Section 21-29-245, or becoming eligible for retirement benefits under Section 21-29-245, and retiring or to be retired from service in a municipality having an assessed valuation of at least Three Hundred Forty Million Dollars $340,000,000.00, according to the 1967 compiled assessment rolls, shall receive in addition to all benefits set forth in Section 21-29-245 the following percentage increases as may be determined by the cost-of-living index as set by the United States government under the following formula:

In any calendar year following 1970 in which the cost-of-living index as set by the United States government for January exceeds the cost-of-living index as set by the United States government for the previous January, the pension payments beginning with March of the current year shall be increased in an amount equal to the percentage increase determined by the increase in the cost-of-living index as set by the United States government.

The accumulated percentage increases provided under this subsection (1) that may be developed by increases in the cost-of-living index as set by the United States government shall not exceed twelve percent (12%).

From and after January 1, 2002, all persons receiving retirement benefits or disability retirement benefits under Section 21-29-241 or 21-29-245 or becoming eligible for retirement benefits or disability retirement benefits under Section 21-29-241 or 21-29-245 and retiring or to be retired from service in a municipality having an assessed valuation of at least Three Hundred Forty Million Dollars ($340,000,000.00), according to the 1967 complied assessment rolls, who are receiving a cost-of-living increase provided under subsection (1) of this section or Chapter 869, Local and Private Laws of 1992, as the case may be, that is equal to an accumulated percentage increase of twelve percent (12%) of the amount of the retirement benefits, shall receive the following cost-of-living increases: In addition to all benefits provided under Section 21-29-241 or 21-29-245, and the cost-of-living increases provided under subsection (1) of this section or Chapter 869, Local and Private Laws of 1992, as the case may be, those persons shall receive the following percentage increases as may be determined by the cost-of-living index as set by the United States government under the following formula:

In any calendar year in which a person is eligible for cost-of-living increases under this subsection (2) in which the cost-of-living index as set by the United States government for January exceeds the cost-of-living index as set by the United States government for the previous January, the pension payments beginning with March of the current year shall be increased in an amount equal to the percentage increase determined by the increase in the cost-of-living index as set by the United States government.

The accumulated percentage increases provided under this subsection (2) that may be developed by increases in the cost-of-living index as set by the United States government shall not exceed seven and one-half percent (7-1/2%).

Any person who is receiving minimum monthly benefits under Chapter 898, Local and Private Laws of 1987, shall receive in addition to all benefits provided under Chapter 898, Local and Private Laws of 1987, the following percentage increases as may be determined by the cost-of-living index as set by the United States government under the following formula:

In any calendar year following 2001 in which the cost-of-living index as set by the United States government for January exceeds the cost-of-living index as set by the United States government for the previous January, the pension payments beginning with March of the current year shall be increased in an amount equal to the percentage increase determined by the increase in the cost-of-living index as set by the United States government.

The accumulated percentage increases provided under this subsection (3) that may be developed by increases in the cost-of-living index as set by the United States government shall not exceed seven and one-half percent (7-1/2%).

The cost-of-living increases authorized under subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall not be provided unless the disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen of any municipality to which this section applies:

Is actuarially sound, as shown by the most recent actuarial study required by Section 21-29-221; and

Will remain actuarially sound if the cost-of-living increases are provided, as shown by a certified statement from the actuarial firm that prepared the most recent actuarial study.

The Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System shall provide the cost-of-living increases authorized under subsections (2) and (3) of this section to the persons authorized and entitled to receive them, after all of the following conditions have been met:

The governing authorities of any municipality to which this section applies must adopt a resolution to provide for the cost-of-living increases, and transmit the resolution to the board of trustees;

The advisory board on the disability and relief fund provided for in Section 21-29-207 must adopt a resolution supporting the providing of the cost-of-living increases, and transmit the resolution to the board of trustees; and

The board of trustees must receive the resolutions from the governing authorities and the advisory board, and receive the most recent actuarial study of the disability and relief fund and the certified statement from the actuarial firm that the disability and relief fund will remain actuarially sound if the cost-of-living increases are provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3494-18; Laws, 1924, ch. 189; Laws, 1930, ch. 55, § 16; Laws, 1948, ch. 421; Laws, 1966, ch. 596, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 575, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 513, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 496, § 1, eff from and after Mar. 1, 2002.